Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES
42-2-131. Revocation of license or permit for failing to comply with a court order relating to nondriving alcohol convictions.

Upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a verdict of guilty by the court or a jury to an offense under section 18-13-122 (3) or 44-3-901 (1)(c) or (1)(d) or any counterpart municipal charter or ordinance offense to such section and upon a failure to complete an alcohol evaluation or assessment, an alcohol education program, or an alcohol treatment program ordered by the court in connection with such plea or verdict, the court shall forward to the department a notice of plea or verdict or the failure to complete on the form prescribed by the department. Any revocation pursuant to section 42-2-125 (1)(m) shall begin when the department gives notice of the revocation to the person in accordance with section 42-2-119 (2).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2152, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 928, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1820, § 12, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-129), ch. 387, p. 1939, § 12, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1083, § 25, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-123.7 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-131 was relocated to § 42-2-139.

42-2-131.5. Revocation of license or permit for convictions involving defacing property. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1538, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1357, § 31, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1820, § 13, effective August 5.

42-2-132. Period of suspension or revocation.

The department shall not suspend a driver's or minor driver's license to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a period of more than one year, except as permitted under section 42-2-138 and except for noncompliance with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section or section 42-7-406, or both.

Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked is not entitled to apply for a probationary license, and, except as provided in sections 42-2-125, 42-2-126, 42-2-132.5, 42-2-138, 42-2-205, and 42-7-406, the person is not entitled to make application for a new license until the expiration of one year from the effective date of the revocation; then the person may make application for a new license as provided by law.
(2) (a) (I) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked is not entitled to apply for a probationary license, and, except as provided in sections 42-2-125, 42-2-126, 42-2-132.5, 42-2-138, 42-2-205, and 42-7-406, the person is not entitled to make application for a new license until the expiration of one year from the effective date of the revocation; then the person may make application for a new license as provided by law.

Following the period of revocation set forth in this subsection (2), the department shall not issue a new license unless and until it is satisfied that the person has demonstrated knowledge of the laws and driving ability through the appropriate motor vehicle testing process, and that the person whose license was revoked pursuant to section 42-2-125 for a second or subsequent alcohol- or drug-related driving offense has completed not less than a level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3.

If the person was in violation of section 42-2-126 (3)(a) and the person had a BAC that was 0.15 or more at the time of driving or within two hours after driving, or if the person's driving record otherwise indicates a designation as a persistent drunk driver as defined in section 42-1-102 (68.5), the department shall require the person to complete a level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3, and, upon the restoration of driving privileges, shall require the person to hold a restricted license requiring the use of an ignition interlock device pursuant to section 42-2-132.5 (1)(a)(II).

If a person seeking reinstatement has not completed the required level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program, the person shall file with the department proof of current enrollment in a level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3, on a form approved by the department.

In the case of a minor driver whose license has been revoked as a result of one conviction for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD, the minor driver, unless otherwise required after an evaluation made pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3, must complete a level I alcohol and drug education program certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services.

Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked under section 42-2-125 (1)(g)(I) or (1)(i) or 42-2-203 where the revocation was due in part to a DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI conviction shall be required to present an affidavit stating that the person has obtained at the person's own expense a signed lease agreement for the installation and use of an approved ignition interlock device, as defined in section 42-2-132.5 (9)(a), in each motor vehicle on which the person's name appears on the registration and any other vehicle that the person may drive during the period of the interlock-restricted license.

The department shall take into consideration any probationary terms imposed on such person by any court in determining whether any revocation shall be continued.

Repealed.

A person whose driving privilege is restored prior to a hearing on the merits of any driving restraint waives the person's right to a hearing on the merits of the driving restraint.

Any person making false application for a new license before the expiration of the period of suspension or revocation commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense. The department shall notify the district attorney's office in the county where such violation occurred, in writing, of all violations of this section.

Any person whose license or other privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked, pursuant to either this article or article 4 or 7 of this title, shall pay a restoration fee of ninety-five dollars to the executive director of the department prior to the issuance to the person of a new license or the restoration of the license or privilege.
(4) (a) (I) Any person whose license or other privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked, pursuant to either this article or article 4 or 7 of this title, shall pay a restoration fee of ninety-five dollars to the executive director of the department prior to the issuance to the person of a new license or the restoration of the license or privilege.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for the fee in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

The department shall transmit the restoration fees collected under this subsection (4) to the state treasurer, who shall credit:

Seventy-three dollars to the driver's license administrative revocation account in the highway users tax fund, which account is hereby created and referred to in this subparagraph (I) as the "account".

The moneys in the account shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department in the administration of driver's license restraints pursuant to either this article or article 4 or article 7 of this title, including, but not limited to, the direct and indirect costs of providing administrative hearings under this title, without the use of moneys from the general fund. At the end of each fiscal year, any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the account shall be transferred out of the account, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(c), C.R.S.; and

Twenty-two dollars to the first time drunk driving offender account in the highway users tax fund, which account is hereby created and referred to in this subparagraph (II) as the "account".

The moneys in the account shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly on and after January 1, 2009, first to the department of revenue to pay its costs associated with the implementation of House Bill 08-1194, as enacted in 2008, and to pay its costs associated with the implementation of House Bill 13-1240, enacted in 2013; second, to the department of revenue to pay a portion of the costs for an ignition interlock device as described by section 42-2-132.5 (4)(a)(II)(C) for a first time drunk driving offender who is unable to pay the costs of the device; third, to the department of revenue to pay a portion of the costs for an ignition interlock device for a persistent drunk driver who is unable to pay the costs of the device and who installs the ignition interlock device on his or her vehicle on or after January 1, 2014; and then to provide two million dollars to the department of transportation for high visibility drunk driving enforcement pursuant to section 43-4-901, C.R.S. Any moneys in the account not expended for these purposes may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the account shall be credited to the account. At the end of each fiscal year, any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the account shall remain in the account and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund, the highway users tax fund, or another fund.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2152, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1353, § 99, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1162, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2)(a)(IV) amended, p. 1076, § 3, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1357, § 32, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 788, § 6, effective June 1; (2)(a)(IV) amended, p. 1284, § 69, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(2)(a)(III) amended, p. 1034, § 74, effective June 1; (2)(a)(II) and (2)(a)(III) amended, p. 1922, § 18, effective July 1; (2)(b) amended, p. 1586, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4)(a)(I) and (4)(b) amended, p. 448, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2005:

(4)(b) amended, p. 142, § 7, effective April 5.

L. 2006:

(2)(a)(II)(B) amended, p. 1368, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(II)(B), (2)(a)(II)(C), (2)(a)(III), and (2)(a)(IV) amended, p. 248, § 11, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I) and (4)(b) amended, p. 837, § 7, effective September 1; (1), (2)(a)(I), and (2)(a)(II)(A) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 835, § 5, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(2)(b) repealed, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1820, § 14, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(2)(a)(II) and (2)(a)(III) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1180, § 104, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(2)(a)(IV) and (4)(b)(II)(B) amended, (HB 12-1168), ch. 278, p. 1483, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(2)(a)(III) and (2)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1882, § 9, effective May 28; (4)(b)(II)(B) amended, (HB 13-1240), ch. 361, p. 2114, § 6, effective May 28, and (2)(a)(II)(B) and (4)(b)(II)(B) amended, (HB 13-1240), ch. 361, p. 2113, § 4, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

IP(4)(b), (4)(b)(I)(A), and (4)(b)(II)(A) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1547, § 12, effective June 5.

L. 2015:

(2)(a)(II)(B) amended, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 998, § 9, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(2)(a)(II) and (2)(a)(III) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1258, § 23, effective May 25.

42-2-132.5. Mandatory and voluntary restricted licenses following alcohol convictions - rules.

Persons required to hold an interlock-restricted license.

The following persons shall hold an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this section for at least one year following reinstatement prior to being eligible to obtain any other driver's license issued under this article:

A person whose license has been revoked for excess BAC pursuant to the provisions of section 42-2-126 when the person's BAC was 0.15 or more at the time of driving or within two hours after driving or whose driving record otherwise indicates a designation of persistent drunk driver as defined in section 42-1-102 (68.5);

A person whose privilege to drive was revoked as an habitual offender under section 42-2-203 in which the revocation was due in part to a DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI conviction; or

A person whose privilege to drive was revoked for interlock circumvention pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (7) of this section.

A person whose privilege to drive was revoked for multiple convictions for any combination of a DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI pursuant to section 42-2-125 (1)(g)(I) or (1)(i) shall hold an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this section for at least two years, but not more than five years, following reinstatement prior to being eligible to obtain any other driver's license issued under this article.

Posting the interlock restriction to driving record prior to reinstatement of driving privileges. As soon as a person meets the conditions of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall note on the driving record of a person required to hold an interlock-restricted license under this section that the person is required to have an approved ignition interlock device. A person whose driving record contains the notation required by this subsection (2) shall not operate a motor vehicle without an approved ignition interlock device until the restriction is removed pursuant to this section.

Minimum interlock restriction requirement for persistent drunk drivers. A person required to hold an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this section who is a persistent drunk driver as defined in section 42-1-102 (68.5), based on an offense that occurred on or after July 1, 2004, shall be required to hold the interlock-restricted license for at least two years following reinstatement before being eligible to obtain any other driver's license issued under this article.

Persons who may acquire an interlock-restricted license prior to serving a full-term revocation.

A person whose privilege to drive has been revoked for one year or more because of a DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI conviction or has been revoked for one year or more for excess BAC under any provision of section 42-2-126 may apply for an early reinstatement with an interlock-restricted license under the provisions of this section after the person's privilege to drive has been revoked for one month; except that a person who is less than twenty-one years of age at the time of the offense may not apply for early reinstatement until his or her license has been revoked for one year. A person whose privilege to drive has been revoked for one year or more because of a refusal may apply for an early reinstatement with an interlock-restricted license under the provisions of this section after the person's privilege to drive has been revoked for two months; except that a person who is less than twenty-one years of age at the time of the offense may not apply for early reinstatement until his or her license has been revoked for one year. Except for first-time offenders as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) or for persistent drunk drivers as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the restrictions imposed pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for the longer of one year or the total time period remaining on the license restraint prior to early reinstatement.

First-time offender eligibility. For revocations for convictions for DUI or DUI per se under section 42-2-125 (1)(b.5) or for excess BAC 0.08 under section 42-2-126 (3)(a)(I) for a first violation that requires only a nine-month revocation, a person twenty-one years of age or older at the time of the offense may apply for an early reinstatement with an interlock-restricted license under the provisions of this section after the person's privilege to drive has been revoked for at least one month. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (II), the restrictions imposed pursuant to this subparagraph (II) shall remain in effect for at least eight months.

First-time offender interlock removal. A person with an interlock-restricted license issued pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) shall be eligible for a license without the restriction required by this section if the department's monthly monitoring reports required in subsection (6) of this section show that, for four consecutive monthly reporting periods, the approved ignition interlock device did not interrupt or prevent the normal operation of the motor vehicle due to an excessive breath alcohol content or did not detect that there has been tampering with the device, there have been no other reports of circumvention or tampering, and there are no grounds to extend the restriction pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection (7) of this section. If the department determines that a person is eligible for a license without the restriction required by this section pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B), the department shall serve upon the person a notice of such eligibility. A person who has not been served but who believes he or she is eligible for a license without the restriction required by this section pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B) may request a hearing on his or her eligibility. The provisions of this sub-subparagraph (B) do not apply to a person covered by subsection (3) of this section.

Financial assistance for first-time offenders and persistent drunk drivers. The department shall establish a program to assist persons who apply for an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this subparagraph (II) or pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) and who are unable to pay the full cost of an approved ignition interlock device. The program shall be funded from the first time drunk driving offender account in the highway users tax fund established pursuant to section 42-2-132 (4)(b)(II).

Early reinstatement eligibility requirement. (I) To be eligible for early reinstatement with an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this subsection (4), a person shall have satisfied all conditions for reinstatement imposed by law including time periods for non-alcohol-related restraints; except that a person whose license was also restrained for driving under restraint pursuant to section 42-2-138 may be eligible for early reinstatement under this section so long as the restraint was caused in part by driving activity occurring after an alcohol-related offense and the length of any license restriction under this section includes the period of restraint under section 42-2-138.

(II) Before being eligible for early reinstatement with an interlock-restricted license under this section, a person shall provide proof of financial responsibility to the department pursuant to the requirements of the "Motor Vehicle Financial Responsibility Act", article 7 of this title. The person shall maintain such proof of financial responsibility with the department for the longer of three years or the period that the person's license is restricted under this section; except that, for an offender subject to section 42-7-408 (1)(c)(I), the period of time that the person must maintain such proof of financial responsibility is the period of time that the person's license is restricted under this section.

In order to be eligible for early reinstatement pursuant to this subsection (4), a person who has been designated an habitual offender under the provisions of section 42-2-202 must have at least one conviction for DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI under section 42-4-1301 and no contributing violations other than violations for driving under restraint under section 42-2-138 or reckless driving under section 42-4-1401.

Requirements for issuing the interlock-restricted license.

The department may issue an interlock-restricted license under this section if the department receives from a person described in this section an affidavit stating that the person has obtained:

A signed lease agreement for the installation and use of an approved ignition interlock device in each motor vehicle on which the person's name appears on the registration and any other vehicle that the person may drive during the period of the interlock-restricted license; and

The written consent of all other owners, if any, of each motor vehicle in which the approved ignition interlock device is installed.

Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the department may issue an interlock-restricted license to any person not seeking early reinstatement but who is required to hold an interlock-restricted license pursuant to subsection (1) of this section who is not the registered owner or co-owner of a motor vehicle if the person submits an affidavit stating that the person is not the owner or co-owner of a motor vehicle and has no access to a motor vehicle in which to install an approved ignition interlock device.

If a person holding an interlock-restricted license issued pursuant to this paragraph (b) becomes an owner or co-owner of a motor vehicle or otherwise has access to a motor vehicle in which an approved ignition interlock device may be installed, he or she shall enter into a lease agreement for the installation and use of an approved ignition interlock device on the vehicle for a period equal to the remaining period of the interlock-restricted license and submit the affidavit described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5).

The terms of the interlock-restricted license shall prohibit the person from driving a motor vehicle other than a vehicle in which an approved ignition interlock device is installed.

The department shall not issue a license under this section that authorizes the operation of a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402 (4) during the restriction required by this section.

Interlock monitoring device - reports. The leasing agency for any approved ignition interlock device shall provide monthly monitoring reports for the device to the department to monitor compliance with the provisions of this section. The leasing agency shall check the device at least once every sixty days to ensure that the device is operating and that there has been no tampering with the device. If the leasing agency detects that there has been tampering with the device, the leasing agency shall notify the department of that fact within five days of the detection.

Licensing sanctions for violating the interlock restrictions.

Due to circumvention - conviction. Upon receipt of notice of a conviction under subsection (10) of this section, the department shall revoke any interlock-restricted license issued to the convicted person pursuant to this section. The department shall not reinstate the interlock-restricted license for a period of one year or the remaining period of license restraint imposed prior to the issuance of an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this section, whichever is longer. A person is entitled to a hearing on the question of whether the revocation is sustained and the calculation of the length of the ineligibility.

Due to circumvention - administrative record. Upon receipt of an administrative record other than a notice of a conviction described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7) establishing that a person who is subject to the restrictions of this section has operated a motor vehicle without an approved ignition interlock device or has circumvented or attempted to circumvent the proper use of an approved ignition interlock device, the department may revoke any license issued to the person pursuant to this section and not reinstate the license for a period of one year or the remaining period of license restraint imposed prior to the issuance of an interlock-restricted license pursuant to this section, whichever is longer. A person is entitled to a hearing on the question of whether the license should be revoked and the calculation of the length of the ineligibility.

Due to a lease violation. If a lease for an approved ignition interlock device is terminated for any reason before the period of the interlock restriction expires and the licensee provides no other such lease, the department shall notify the licensee that the department shall suspend the license until the licensee enters into a new signed lease agreement for the remaining period of the interlock restriction.

Extending the interlock license restriction. If the monthly monitoring reports required by subsection (6) of this section show that the approved ignition interlock device interrupted or prevented the normal operation of the vehicle due to excessive breath alcohol content in three of any twelve consecutive reporting periods, the department shall extend the interlock restriction on the person's license for an additional twelve months after the expiration of the existing interlock restriction. The department shall notify the person that the ignition interlock restriction is being extended and that his or her license shall be suspended unless the person enters into a new signed lease agreement for the use of an approved ignition interlock device for the extended period. The person is entitled to a hearing on the extension of the restriction. Based upon findings at the hearing, including aggravating and mitigating factors, the hearing officer may sustain the extension, rescind the extension, or reduce the period of extension.

Rules. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Approved ignition interlock device definition - rules.

For the purposes of this section, "approved ignition interlock device" means a device approved by the department of public health and environment that is installed in a motor vehicle and that measures the breath alcohol content of the driver before a vehicle is started and that periodically requires additional breath samples during vehicle operation. The device may not allow a motor vehicle to be started or to continue normal operation if the device measures an alcohol level above the level established by the department of public health and environment.

The state board of health may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this subsection (9) concerning approved ignition interlock devices.

Operating vehicle after circumventing interlock device.

A person whose privilege to drive is restricted to the operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an approved ignition interlock device and who operates a motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle equipped with an approved ignition interlock device or who circumvents or attempts to circumvent the proper use of an approved ignition interlock device commits a class 1 traffic misdemeanor.

If a peace officer issues a citation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (10), the peace officer shall immediately confiscate the offending driver's license, shall file an incident report on a form provided by the department, and shall not permit the driver to continue to operate the motor vehicle.

A court shall not accept a plea of guilty to another offense from a person charged with a violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (10); except that the court may accept a plea of guilty to another offense upon a good-faith representation by the prosecuting attorney that the attorney could not establish a prima facie case if the defendant were brought to trial on the offense.

Tampering with an approved ignition interlock device.

A person shall not intercept, bypass, or interfere with or aid any other person in intercepting, bypassing, or interfering with an approved ignition interlock device for the purpose of preventing or hindering the lawful operation or purpose of the approved ignition interlock device required under this section.

A person whose privilege to drive is restricted to the operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an approved ignition interlock device shall not drive a motor vehicle in which an approved ignition interlock device is installed pursuant to this section if the person knows that any person has intercepted, bypassed, or interfered with the approved ignition interlock device.

A person violating any provision of this subsection (11) commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 1160, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, (3)(a.5) added, and (4)(a) and (4)(b) repealed, pp. 1076, 1077, §§ 4, 5, 6, effective July 1; (1.5), (6), and (7) added and (3), (4)(c), and (5) amended, p. 1079, § 10, effective January 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1918, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5)(b) amended, p. 170, § 1, effective March 23; (1.7) added and (3)(a) amended, p. 1130, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b.5) and (1.8) added, p. 1368, §§ 6, 7, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2008:

(1)(a), (1)(b.5), (1)(c), and (1.5)(a) amended, p. 249, § 12, effective July 1; (1.5)(a) and (3)(a) amended, p. 835, § 6, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2012:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 12-1168), ch. 278, p. 1476, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1)(a), (1)(c), and (4)(c) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1882, § 10, effective May 28; (1)(b), (4)(a)(I), and (4)(a)(II)(C) amended, (HB 13-1240), ch. 361, p. 2111, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 995, § 3, effective August 5.

42-2-133. Surrender and return of license.

The department, upon suspending or revoking a license, shall require that such license be surrendered to the department.

At the end of the period of suspension, the licensee may apply for and receive a replacement license upon payment of a fee. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2). The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the licensing services cash fund created by section 42-2-114.5 (1).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2153, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 649, § 18, effective May 27.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1548, § 13, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-125 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-133 was relocated to § 42-2-141.

42-2-134. Foreign license invalid during suspension.

No resident or nonresident whose driver's license or right or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended or revoked as provided in this article shall operate a motor vehicle in this state under a license, permit, or registration certificate issued by any other jurisdiction or otherwise during such suspension or after such revocation until a new license is obtained when and as permitted under this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2153, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-126 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-134 was relocated to § 42-2-142.

42-2-135. Right to appeal.

Every person finally denied a license or identification card, whose identification card has been finally cancelled, or whose license has been finally cancelled, suspended, or revoked by or under the authority of the department may, within thirty-five days thereafter, obtain judicial review in accordance with section 24-4-106, C.R.S.; except that the venue for such judicial review shall be in the county of residence of the person seeking judicial review.

The district attorney of the judicial district in which review is applied for pursuant to this section, upon request of the attorney general, shall represent the department.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2154, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 203, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (HB 15-1021), ch. 25, p. 63, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-127 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-135 was relocated to § 42-2-143.

42-2-136. Unlawful possession or use of license.

No person shall have in such person's possession a lawfully issued driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or instruction permit, knowing that such license or permit has been falsely altered by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter, or any other means so that such license or permit in its thus altered form falsely appears or purports to be in all respects an authentic and lawfully issued license or permit.

No person shall fraudulently obtain a driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or an instruction permit.

No person shall have in such person's possession a paper, document, or other instrument which falsely appears or purports to be in all respects a lawfully issued and authentic driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or instruction permit, knowing that such instrument was falsely made and was not lawfully issued.

No person shall display or represent as being such person's own any driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or any instruction permit which was lawfully issued to another person.

No person shall fail or refuse to surrender to the department upon its lawful demand any driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or any instruction or temporary permit issued to such person which has been suspended, revoked, or cancelled by the department. The department shall notify the district attorney's office in the county where such violation occurred, in writing, of all violations of this subsection (4).

No person shall permit any unlawful use of a driver's license issued to such person.

(5.5) No person shall photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce any driver's license or facsimile thereof for the purpose of distribution, resale, reuse, or manipulation of the data or images contained in such driver's license unless authorized by the department or otherwise authorized by law.

Any person who violates any provision of subsections (1) to (5) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (5.5) of this section commits a class 3 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2154, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(5.5) added and (6) amended, p. 354, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(1) to (4) amended, p. 1357, § 33, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 941, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(6)(b) amended, p. 1560, § 363, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-128 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

(1) For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (6)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-2-137. False affidavit - penalty.

Any person who makes any false affidavit or knowingly swears or affirms falsely to any matter or thing required by the terms of this part 1 to be sworn to or affirmed commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense. The department shall notify the district attorney's office in the county where such violations occurred, in writing, of all violations of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2154, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-129 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).